Maryland, session 2025, HB0587.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–206.1.
(a) An individual honorably discharged from military service may apply to obtain
a high school diploma if the individual withdrew from a regular full–time public or private
high school accredited by the State Board to enlist in the armed forces of the United States
during[:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0587*

HOUSE BILL 587
(1) World War II;
(2) The Korean Conflict; or
(3) The Vietnam Conflict] AN ARMED CONFLICT AUTHORIZED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES OR CONGRESS;
(4) THE GULF WAR;
(5) THE AFGHAN CONFLICT; OR
(6) THE IRAQ WAR.
(b) To obtain a high school diploma under subsection (a) of this section, the
individual shall apply to the county board in the county where the individual resides or
where the school from which the individual withdrew was located.
(c) Each county board shall adopt rules and regulations to establish procedures
for awarding diplomas under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.